Rhode Island statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 7 Retail Licenses
3-7-25.
Sanitary conditions for dispensing of malt beverages or wine.

Beer or wine pipe lines, faucets and barrel-tapping devices used for the dispensing of malt beverages or wine in places where the dispensing is carried on by licensees under this chapter shall be cleaned at least once every four (4) weeks by the use of a hydraulic pressure mechanism, hand-pump suction or a force cleaner or other system approved by the department or shall be permanently kept clean by a device approved by the department. After cleaning, the lines shall be rinsed with clear water until all chemicals, if any have been used, are removed. The cleaning equipment must be operated in conformance with the manufacturer’s recommendations.

A record, the form of which shall be approved by the department, shall be used to record the dates and the methods used in cleaning of beer or wine pipe lines, coils, tubes and appurtenances. This record shall be signed by the person who performs the cleaning operation and countersigned by the licensee. The records shall be kept on the licensed premises for a period of one year from the date of the last entry and made available at all times for inspection by health enforcement and law enforcement officers.

[Deleted by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 20, § 1].

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 10; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 30, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 20, § 1.

3-7-26.
Certain practices prohibited.

No licensee, employee or agent of any licensee who operates under a license to sell alcoholic beverages shall:

Cause or require any person or persons to buy more than one drink at a time by reducing the price of that drink;

Increase the volume of alcohol contained in any alcoholic beverage without proportionately increasing the price;

Sell, propose to sell or deliver to any person or persons an unlimited number of drinks during a certain period of time for a fixed price; or

Allow or encourage any game or promotion on the premises which involves the drinking of alcoholic beverages or the awarding of alcoholic beverages as prizes for consumption on the premises.

No licensee shall advertise or promote in any manner, or in any medium, happy hours, open bars, two-for-one nights and/or free drink specials.

Any licensee is prohibited from knowingly allowing the use of its premises as part of an organized pub crawl, so-called. A pub crawl shall be defined as an organized event intended to promote the organized, commercial travel of significantly large groups of individuals between licensed premises for the primary purpose of consuming alcoholic beverages at more than one premise. Evidence of a pub crawl shall include, but not be limited by:

The existence of advertising, flyers, tickets or other printed or electronic material promoting or describing a planned pub crawl;

Organized, commercial transportation intended to move a total of fifty (50) or more individuals from one premise to another in an organized fashion; and

Evidence of compensation paid to an organizer by participants in a pub crawl. The department of business regulation is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations consistent with this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a licensee from offering free food or entertainment at any time; or to prohibit licensees from including an alcoholic beverage as part of a meal package; or to prohibit the sale or delivery of wine by the bottle or carafe when sold with meals or to more than one person; or to prohibit free wine tastings. Except as otherwise limited by this section, nothing contained in this section shall limit or may restrict the price which may be charged by any licensee for any size alcoholic beverage to be consumed on the licensed premises.

Adherence to this section is deemed to be a condition attached to the issuance and/or continuation of every license to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on the licensed premises, and this section shall be enforced by the applicable local licensing authority, its agents, and the department.

The provisions of this section are deemed to be severable and any final decision by a court of competent jurisdiction holding that any provision of this section is void, shall not make void nor affect any of the remaining provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 10; P.L. 2004, ch. 508, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 1.

3-7-27.
Insurance requirements.

In the town of Burrillville, an applicant for a license under this chapter shall file with the application a certificate of insurance evidencing commercial, general-liability and property-damage coverage in the minimum amount of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000); or for a minimum amount to be set by ordinance. The certificate shall provide that the insurance shall not be modified or cancelled unless prior, advance notice is given to the town of Burrillville and that the town of Burrillville is named as an additional insured. A licensee must be insured by a carrier licensed in this state.

In the town of North Providence, an applicant for a license under this chapter shall file with the application a certificate of insurance evidencing commercial, general-liability, and property-damage coverage in the minimum amount of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000); or for a minimum amount to be set by ordinance. The certificate shall provide that the insurance shall not be modified or cancelled unless prior, advance notice is given to the town of North Providence, according to the terms of the insurance policy, and that the town of North Providence is named as an additional insured. A licensee must be insured by a carrier licensed in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 359, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 58, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 182, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 364, § 2.

3-7-28.
Time for licensee to produce receipts and invoices to inspector.

Holders of Class A licenses issued under title 3 of the general laws shall be required to maintain on the premises, and to produce upon demand by an inspector authorized to demand, any and all records of receipts and invoices for the purchase of alcoholic beverages.

Holders of licenses other than Class A issued under title 3 of the general laws shall have not more than one business day to produce receipts and invoices for the purchase of alcoholic beverages when demanded by an inspector authorized to demand records of receipts and invoices. Nothing herein shall require such licensee to produce invoices and receipts upon demand.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 316, § 1.

3-7-29.
Liquor liability insurance.

Any applicant or holder of any retail license for the sale of alcoholic beverages issued pursuant to this chapter, except those applicants for or holders of class F liquor licenses or class AS liquor licenses and except as provided in §

3-7-27

, shall file with the application a certificate of insurance evidencing commercial, general-liability, and liquor-liability and property-damage coverage in the minimum amount of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000). Failure to maintain insurance as required by this section shall result in a revocation of the retail license unless the holder of the license reinstates insurance coverage within forty-eight (48) hours of notice of revocation. The certificate of insurance shall provide that the insurance shall not be modified or cancelled unless prior, advance notice is given to the licensing authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 364, § 1.